New Jersey, session 221, S4173.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person who holds a plenary retail consumption license or seasonal retail consumption license in a municipality in this State where 200 or more of these licenses currently are active or inactive shall include in the price charged for each alcoholic beverage sold on the licensed premises a fee of $0.25.  These fees shall be payable to the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control in the Department of Law and Public Safety. b.    The fees paid to the director under subsection a. of this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Education, Rehabilitation and Enforcement Fund established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1983, c.531 (C.26:2B-32). c.     The director shall promulgate guidelines or directives necessary to implement this act. 2.   This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, except the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.